Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Tourism


and Recreation Department from any monies not otherwise appropriated


from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal


year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Million Three Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($1,300,000.00) for the purpose of providing


support to multi-county organizations to support tourism.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3256 JC 12/9/2025 9:54:42 AM

Req. No. 3256 Page 1